Wisconsin, session 2025, SB479.
do enact as follows:SB479,11Section 1. 236.01 of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,3,62236.01 Purpose of chapter. The purpose of this chapter is to regulate the 3subdivision of land to promote public health, safety, and general welfare; to further 4the orderly layout and use of land; to prevent the overcrowding of land; to lessen 5congestion in the streets and highways; to ensure that land is developed in a 6manner that supports healthy, livable communities; to foster the development of a 7range of housing types; to advance complete streets that prioritize safety, comfort, 8and accessibility for pedestrians, cyclists, transit riders, and motorists alike; to 9provide for adequate light and air; to facilitate adequate provision for water, 1sewerage, and other public requirements; to encourage development patterns that 2provide safe and convenient transportation choices for a variety of users; to provide 3for proper ingress and egress; and to promote proper monumenting of land 4subdivided and conveyancing by accurate legal description. The approvals to be 5obtained by the subdivider as required in this chapter shall be based on 6requirements designed to accomplish the aforesaid purposes.SB479,27Section 2. 236.105 of the statutes is created to read:SB479,3,178236.105 Presubmission conceptual review. The municipality, town, or 9county that has the authority under s. 236.10 to approve a subdivision shall provide 10the subdivider the opportunity to meet informally with representatives of the 11municipality, town, or county before the subdivider submits a preliminary plat for 12approval, or a final plat if the subdivider does not intend to submit a preliminary 13plat for approval, to obtain the representatives’ conceptual review of the 14subdivider’s proposed subdivision and opinions regarding whether the subdivision 15complies with the municipality’s, town’s, or county’s requirements and conditions 16for approving plats. Conceptual reviews and opinions provided under this section 17are not binding on the municipality, town, or county, or the subdivider.SB479,318Section 3. 236.11 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,4,519236.11 (1) (a) Before submitting a final plat for approval, the subdivider may 20submit, or the approving authority may require that the subdivider submit, a 21preliminary plat. It shall be clearly marked “preliminary plat” and, except as 22provided in par. (d), shall be in sufficient detail to determine whether the final plat 23will meet layout requirements. Within Subject to par. (d), within 90 days, the 24approving authority, or its agent authorized to approve preliminary plats, shall 1take action to approve, approve conditionally, or reject the preliminary plat and 2shall state in writing any conditions of approval or reasons for rejection, unless the 3time is extended by agreement with the subdivider. Failure of the approving 4authority or its agent to act within the 90 days, or extension thereof, constitutes an 5approval of the preliminary plat.SB479,46Section 4. 236.11 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB479,4,157236.11 (1) (d) A subdivider that submits a preliminary plat for approval under 8par. (a) may submit preliminary, rather than final, plans and reports regarding 9sewer, water, road cross-sections, grading, stormwater, soil testing, landscaping, 10and street lighting. The approving authority, or its agent authorized to approve 11preliminary plats, may not reject the preliminary plat on the basis that the plans 12and reports are not final, but the approving authority or its agent may approve 13conditionally the preliminary plat on that basis and state in writing the conditions 14of approval as allowed under par. (a), including conditions that final plans and 15reports are submitted.SB479,516Section 5. 236.13 (2) (am) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,5,317236.13 (2) (am) 1. a. As a further condition of approval, the governing body of 18the town or municipality within which the subdivision lies may require that the 19subdivider make and agree to install any public improvements reasonably 20necessary or that the subdivider and provide financial security to ensure that the 21subdivider will make those improvements within a reasonable time after approval. 22The governing body may not require that public improvements be installed or 23accepted as a condition of submitting, reviewing, approving, or recording of a 24preliminary or final plat. The governing body may not require the subdivider to 1provide security at the commencement of a project in an amount that is more than 2120 percent of the estimated total cost to complete the required public 3improvements, as determined under subd. 1d.SB479,64Section 6. 236.13 (2) (am) 3. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,5,75236.13 (2) (am) 3. b. Upon such substantial completion, any outstanding local 6building permits for each home site on the plat that are related to, and dependent 7upon, substantial completion shall be released.SB479,78Section 7. 236.25 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,5,149236.25 (1) The subdivider shall have the final plat recorded in the office of the 10register of deeds of the county in which the subdivision is located. Subject to sub. 11(2), a final plat that has the approvals required under s. 236.10, or that is deemed 12approved under s. 236.11, is entitled to be recorded, and the clerk of the body having 13authority to approve the plat shall make a certificate to that effect on the face of the 14plat no later than 10 days after the subdivider requests the certificate.SB479,815Section 8. 236.45 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB479,6,616236.45 (1) Declaration of legislative intent. The purpose of this section 17is to promote the public health, safety, and general welfare of the community and 18the regulations authorized to be made are designed to lessen congestion in the 19streets and highways; to further the orderly layout and use of land; to secure safety 20from fire, panic, and other dangers; to provide adequate light and air, including 21access to sunlight for solar collectors and to wind for wind energy systems; to 22prevent the overcrowding of land; to avoid undue concentration of population; to 23facilitate adequate provision for transportation, water, sewerage, schools, parks, 24playgrounds, and other public requirements; and to facilitate the further 1resubdivision of larger tracts into smaller parcels of land. The regulations provided 2for by this section shall be made with reasonable consideration, among other things, 3of the character of the municipality, town, or county with a view of conserving the 4value of the buildings placed upon land, providing the best possible environment for 5human habitation, and for encouraging the most appropriate use of land 6throughout the municipality, town, or county.SB479,97Section 9. Initial applicability.SB479,6,98(1) The treatment of ss. 236.11 (1) (a) and (d) and 236.13 (2) (am) 1. a. first 9applies to a plat submitted on the effective date of this subsection.SB479,1010Section 10. Effective date.SB479,6,1211(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 12publication.SB479,6,1313